Hawaii statutes.
§487-4 Salary and duties of executive
director; benefits. The director may define the executive director's
powers and duties and fix the executive director's compensation. The executive
director and attorney staff members shall be entitled to participate in any
employee benefit plan. [L 1969, c 175, §4; am L 1975, c 58, §21; am L 1982, c
129, §18; am L 1986, c 128, §16; am L 1988, c 60, §4]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next